California statutes. Education Code
(1) An expenditure of funds received by a school district or community college district through the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter is for purposes other than those specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(2) The expenditure is not in compliance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(3) That an expenditure in violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution will be made or will continue to be made during the litigation that would produce waste or great or irreparable injury.

(4) The governing board of a school district or community college has willfully failed to appoint the citizens’ oversight committee in violation of the requirements of Section 15278.

(b) An action brought pursuant to this section shall take special precedence over all civil matters on the calendar of the court except those matters granted equal precedence by law.

(c) The rights, remedies, or penalties established by this section are cumulative to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws, including subdivision (a) of Section 526 of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) If an order is obtained to restrain and prevent an expenditure of funds pursuant to subdivision (a), a court may award attorneys’ fees pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1021.5) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) The action authorized by this section shall be known as a “School Bond Waste Prevention Action.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15286.

Consistent with the provisions contained in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the required annual, independent financial and performance audits for the preceding fiscal year shall be submitted to the citizens’ oversight committee established pursuant to Section 15278 at the same time they are submitted to the school district or community college district,
 no later than March 31 of each year. These audits shall be conducted in accordance with the Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States for financial and performance audits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 91, Sec. 2.   (SB 581)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15288.

It is the intent of the Legislature that upon receipt of allegations of waste or misuse of bond funds authorized in this chapter, appropriate law enforcement officials shall expeditiously pursue the investigation and prosecution of any violation of law associated with the expenditure of those funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bonds of School Facilities Improvement Districts [15300. - 15425.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15300. - 15303.]

15300.

This chapter provides a method for the formation of school facilities improvement districts consisting of a portion of the territory within a school district or community college district, for the conduct of a bond election within a school facilities improvement district, and for the issuance of general obligation bonds by a school district or community college district for a school facilities improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

(a) A school district or community college district that has a community facilities district formed pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, as set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, that has as one of its purposes the construction of school facilities within a portion of the territory of the school district or community college district, may proceed under this chapter.

(b) The boundaries of a school facilities improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter shall include all of the portion of the territory within the boundaries of the school district or community college district that is not located within the boundaries of the community facilities district as described in subdivision (a).

(c) A school district or community college district may proceed under this chapter without meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) if the governing board of the school district or community college district determines that it is necessary and in the best interest of the school district or community college district, respectively, to form a school facilities improvement district pursuant to this chapter to finance school facilities and purposes authorized pursuant to Section 15100. As a part of that determination, the governing board of the school district or community college district shall make a finding that the overall cost of financing the bonds issued pursuant to this part would be less than the overall cost of other school facilities financing options available to the school district or community college district, including, but not limited to, issuing bonds pursuant to the Mello-Roos Communities Facilities Act of 1982 (Ch. 2.5 (commencing with Sec. 53311), Pt. 1, Div. 2, Title 5, Gov. C.). The governing board of the school district or community college district proceeding under this subdivision shall define the boundaries of the school facilities improvement district to include any portion of territory within the jurisdiction of the school district or community college district.

(d) The governing body of a school district or community college district that proceeds under this chapter shall comply with the filing requirements established by Section 54902 of the Government Code. A plat or map that is filed pursuant to this subdivision shall specifically identify property, located within the school district or community college district, that is not located within the improvement district established by the school district or community college district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15302.

(a) Two or more small school districts that have had the issuance of bonds authorized by the voters pursuant to this chapter may form a joint powers authority in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of issuing or selling those bonds for raising money for the purposes authorized.

(b) A joint powers authority described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed a school district for purposes of this chapter only and may exercise all authority granted to a school district under this chapter under the conditions imposed by this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds.

(c) Each small school district shall be responsible for its respective voter-approved bonds pursuant to this chapter. A joint powers authority formed pursuant to this section shall serve the purpose of sharing administrative costs associated with the issuance and sale of bonds and shall not otherwise affect the terms of the respective voter-approved bonds.

(d) For purposes of this section, “small school district” means a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 451, Sec. 3.   (AB 1550)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.

(a) This chapter shall not be operative in a county or counties until the board of supervisors of the county in which the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district or community college district in which a proposed school facilities improvement district is located, and the board of supervisors of any county in which a proposed school facilities improvement district is located, by resolution adopted by a majority vote of each affected board of supervisors, makes this chapter applicable in the county or counties. The resolution may make this chapter operative in the county generally, or to one or more school districts or community college districts.

(b) A board of supervisors adopting a
 resolution pursuant to subdivision (a) shall file that resolution with the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission established pursuant to Section 8855 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.19.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation of District [15320. - 15327.]

15320.

Whenever the governing board of a school district or community college district meeting the requirements set forth in Section 15301 determines that a school facilities improvement district is necessary, the governing board shall adopt a resolution of intention that states all of the following:

(a) The intention of the governing board to form the proposed school facilities improvement district.

(b) The general purposes for which the proposed school facilities improvement district is to be formed.

(c) The estimated cost of the school facilities improvement project.

(d) That any taxes levied for the purpose of financing the general obligation bonds issued to finance the project shall be levied exclusively upon the lands in the proposed school facilities improvement district.

(e) That a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed school facilities improvement district is on file with the governing board of the school district or community college district and is available for inspection by the public. The boundaries of the school facilities improvement district shall meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 15301.

(f) The time and place for a hearing by the governing board on the formation of the proposed school facilities improvement district.

(g) That any interested persons, including all persons owning lands in the school district or community college district, or in the proposed school facilities improvement district, may appear and be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15321.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication shall be at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. No notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15322.

The governing board of the school district or community college district shall hold the hearing provided for by resolution of intention at the time and place fixed by that resolution. Any interested person, including, but not limited to, all persons owning land in the school district, or in the proposed school facilities improvement district or community college district, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15323.

At the hearing, the governing board of the school district or community college district may adopt a resolution proposing modifications, consistent with Section 15302, of the purpose stated in the resolution of intention. A resolution proposing modifications shall describe the proposed modifications, state the change, if any, in the estimated cost of carrying out the purpose, and shall fix a time and place for the hearing by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15324.

The governing board of the school district or community college district shall publish the resolution proposing the modifications to the resolution of intention once in the same newspaper in which the resolution of intention was published at least 14 days prior to the date of hearing on the proposed modifications.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15325.

The hearing on any proposed modifications may be held at the same time and place as any continued hearing on the resolution of intention and both hearings may be held and conducted concurrently.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15326.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention and of the hearing, if any, upon proposed modifications, the governing board may by resolution order the school facilities improvement district formed for the purpose and with the boundaries described in the resolution of intention, and, if relevant, the resolution proposing modifications. The resolution ordering the school facilities improvement district formed shall state the estimated cost of carrying out the purpose described in the resolution. The resolution shall also number and designate the school facilities improvement district substantially as “School Facilities Improvement District of the ____ School District” or “School Facilities Improvement District of the ____ Community College District.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15326.5.

The governing board may amend a previously adopted resolution ordering the formation of a school facilities improvement district to change or add to the purposes for which the school facilities improvement district is formed and the projects to be financed and to increase or decrease the amount of bonds that may be issued for those purposes. Bonds may be issued only for the purposes stated in, and in an amount not exceeding the amount stated in, a proposition submitted to and approved by the voters of the school facilities improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15327.

The governing board of the school district or community college district in which a school facilities improvement district has been formed shall have the same rights, powers, duties and responsibilities with respect to the formation and government of school facilities improvement district as the governing board has with respect to the school district or community college district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Financing the Bonds [15334.5. - 15334.5.]

15334.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bonded indebtedness may be incurred pursuant to this part in an amount that would cause the bonded indebtedness of the territory of the school facilities improvement district or of the school district or community college district of which the school facilities improvement district is a part, to exceed the limitation of indebtedness specified in Sections 15102 and 15106. No bonded indebtedness may be incurred pursuant to this part in an amount that would cause the bonded indebtedness of the territory of the school facilities improvement district to exceed the limitation of indebtedness specified in Sections 15102 and 15106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Provisions for Bond Elections [15340. - 15345.]

15340.

(a) After adopting the resolution ordering the formation of the school facilities improvement district, the governing board may provide for and call a special bond election within the school facilities improvement district pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) and, if applicable, pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264), except as otherwise provided in this chapter, for the approval of a proposition of whether an indebtedness of the school facilities improvement district shall be incurred through the issuance of bonds for the school facilities improvement district. The election shall be deemed to be a school district or community college district election, as appropriate, for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100).

(b) The indebtedness and the bonds shall be payable from taxes to be levied and collected upon lands located within the school facilities improvement district. The bonds shall be deemed to be bonds of the school district or community college district that created the school facilities improvement district, issued for the benefit of the land within the school facilities improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15345.

Any qualified elector who is a resident of the territory of the school facilities improvement district may vote on the proposition of issuing bonds of the school facilities improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Issuance and Sale of Bonds [15350. - 15359.3.]

15350.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, bonds of a school facilities improvement district shall be authorized, offered for sale, issued and paid, and taxes levied and collected for payments related to those bonds, and the proceeds of the bonds and the collected taxes deposited and held, as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), and in compliance with Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264), if applicable.

(b) Whenever in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) or Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) a reference is made to the bonds of the district, that reference shall mean, in the case of bonds of a school facilities improvement district, bonds authorized by the electors of the school facilities improvement district, and issued on behalf of the school facilities improvement district.

(c) Whenever in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) or Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) a reference is made to assessment or taxation of property in the district for payment of the bonds, that reference shall mean, in the case of bonds of a school facilities improvement district, the assessment and taxation of property located only within the school facilities improvement district for payment of amounts due related to bonds of the school facilities improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15352.

The bonds shall be issued in the name of the school facilities improvement district and shall be designated “Bonds of the School Facilities Improvement District of the ____ School District” or “Bonds of the School Facilities Improvement District of the ____ Community College District” and each bond and all interest coupons shall state that the tax for the payment thereof shall be limited to annual taxes to be levied upon and collected from the lands within the school facilities improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15357.

(a) The board of supervisors shall establish within the county treasury a school facilities improvement fund for each school facilities improvement district for the purpose of depositing the proceeds of the bonds of the school facilities improvement district. The board of supervisors also shall establish within the county treasury a school facilities improvement bond interest and sinking fund for each school facilities improvement district.

(b) Whenever in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100) a reference is made to the interest and sinking fund of the district or the building fund of the district, that reference shall mean, in the case of bonds of a school facilities improvement district, the interest and sinking fund of the school facilities improvement district or the building fund of the school facilities improvement district, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15359.3.

The governing board of a school district or community college district may proceed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) and subject to the requirements therein on behalf of a school facilities improvement district that is created by and under the exclusive authority of the school district or community college district under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 132, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Maximum Tax for Payment of Bonds [15425. - 15425.]

15425.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature that the rate of taxes levied annually upon the property in a school facilities improvement district formed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15301 not be greater than the rate of the annual special tax levied upon parcels in the same school district or community college district that are part of a community facilities district formed pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, as set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code that has as one of its purposes the construction of school facilities within a portion of the territory of the school district or community college district. A determination by the governing board of a school district or community college district, made at the time bonds are sold pursuant to this part, that the rate of taxes to be levied annually upon the property in the school facilities improvement district, based upon tax rate estimates prepared pursuant to Section 9401 of the Elections Code, does not exceed the rate of the annual special tax levied upon parcels in the same school district or community college district that are part of a community facilities district formed pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, shall be conclusive evidence of compliance with the intent of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Call and Redemption of State School Construction Bonds [15600. - 15600.]

15600.

The State School Building Finance Committee or other governmental body empowered to make a determination of whether any or all of the bonds authorized to be issued by the state, under legislation enacted following the effective date of this section, for the purpose of assisting local school districts in the acquisition of sites, the construction of school buildings and related facilities, and the purchase of furniture and equipment, may instruct the Treasurer to include in the bonds, or any of them, provisions permitting their call and redemption at the option of the state prior to their maturity and indicating the price at which such bonds shall be subject to redemption; and it shall be the duty of the Treasurer to comply therewith. No bonds shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless they contain a recital to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State School Building Aid Law, 1949 [15700. - 15795.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15700. - 15754.]

15700.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people thereof for the state to aid school districts of the state in providing necessary and adequate school sites and buildings for the pupils of the public school system, the system being a matter of general concern inasmuch as the education of the children of the state is an obligation and function of the state.

In adopting this act, the Legislature considers that the great need in school construction is for adequate classrooms for the
 education of the pupils of the public school system. It is the intent of the Legislature to first satisfy this primary need to the greatest extent possible before providing additional educational facilities, regardless of how desirable such additional facilities may be. To the end that school classrooms may be made available at once and to all school districts in need of such classrooms, provisions for other needed school facilities is necessarily subordinated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15701.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Education for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(c) “Project” means the purposes for which a school district has applied for an apportionment under this chapter.

(d) “Grade level maintained by a
 district” means either of the following:

(1) The kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by an elementary school district or a unified school district.

(2) Grades 7 to 12, inclusive, grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or grades 7 to 10, inclusive, maintained by a high school district or unified school district.

(e) “Apportionment” means an apportionment made under this chapter unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15702.

The Director of General Services shall administer this chapter and shall provide any assistance to the board that it may require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15703.

The State Allocation Board is continued in existence for the purposes of this chapter. The members of the board and the Members of the Legislature meeting with the board in an advisory capacity shall receive no compensation for their services under this chapter but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties hereunder, to be paid out of the Public School Building Loan Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15704.

The board by the adoption of rules shall give priority in allocating funds to districts to those districts where the children will benefit most from additional schoolhouse facilities. This priority shall be based on acuteness of overcrowding, on sudden growth in attendance, on amount of local tax funds expended for housing of a character within the purposes of this chapter, and on the time the district’s application has been ready for allotment. The board may make exceptions when it determines that it will be for the benefit of the children affected.

In adopting rules the board may provide for the granting of priority points to govern the allocation according to the following schedule:

(a) Two priority points may be granted for each percent of the latest computed average daily attendance of the district that is inadequately housed. The number of inadequately housed pupils is the latest computed average daily attendance of the district less the sum of both of the following:

(1) Any classrooms up to a total of two, multiplied by 25.

(2) Any classrooms in excess of two, multiplied by 33.

The term “classrooms” for the purposes of this computation shall mean any school classrooms, temporary and permanent, determined by the State Department of Education to be safely usable.

(b) One priority point may be granted for each 5 percent of the latest computed average daily attendance of the district that represents an increase over the average daily attendance for the fifth preceding school year.

(c) One point of priority may be granted for each one-twentieth of 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the district, collected in taxes and expended for school housing within the scope of this chapter since July 1, 1944. Expenditure of the proceeds of the sale of bonds shall not be counted but expenditure for interest and retirement of bonds shall be counted.

(d) Not more than one point of priority shall be allowed for each calendar month that the completed application of the district has awaited funds.

If any computation of priority points made under this
 section results in a fraction of a point, that fraction shall be disregarded and the number of priority points shall be taken as the next lowest whole number.

These priorities shall be recomputed at least semiannually when funds are available for allocation, on the respective periods of time next preceding the date of computation. The State Department of Education shall assist and cooperate with the board in determining priority ratings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.

In addition to any other powers and duties as are granted the board by this chapter, the board shall do each of the following:

(1) Establish any qualifications not in conflict with other provisions of this chapter that it deems will best serve the purposes of this chapter for determining the eligibility of school districts to apportionments of funds under this chapter.

(2) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the
 administration of, and the expenditure of funds made available for the purpose of, this chapter that it deems necessary and which are not in conflict with the powers and duties of the State Department of Education or of the director granted or imposed by this chapter.

(3) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, requiring any procedure, forms, and information, that it may deem necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15706.

Apportionment from the Public School Building Loan Fund to school districts shall be made in the manner and subject to the conditions herein provided and in accordance with policies adopted by the board, for all of the following purposes:

(a) The purchase and improvement of schoolsites which have been approved by the State Department of Education.

(b) The purchase of desks, tables, chairs, and built-in or fixed equipment, as listed in Part
 III of the California School Accounting Manual contained in the Bulletin of the California State Department of Education, Volume XIII, No. 2, June 1944, or as amended or revised.

(c) The planning and construction, reconstruction, alteration of, and addition to, school buildings for any facilities that are approved by the State Department of Education as essential, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works.

Where a district is required by a contract entered into between itself and a contractor, to obtain at its own expense insurance covering risks incurred during any construction, reconstruction or alteration for which an apportionment has been made, the costs thereof may be paid either directly, or by way of reimbursement, to the district out of the apportionment, or out of any apportionment made specifically covering the insurance. However, in other respects the
 apportionments are eligible for payment under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15707.

In addition to the purposes for which apportionments may be made to school districts under Section 15706, apportionments may also be made to school districts for the construction, repair, attachment or development of offsite facilities, utilities or improvements which the board determines are necessary to the proper operation or functioning of the school facilities for which apportionments are made, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15708.

In making application for, and in expending, apportionments of funds under this chapter, a school district acts as an agent of the state and all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to through the expenditure of funds apportioned under this chapter, are declared to be, and are, the property of the state. Upon the payment by the district of the amounts required to be paid by it to the state under this chapter the board shall, in the name of the state, convey the property to the
 district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15709.

The board may require school districts to insure for the benefit of the state all sites, equipment, and buildings which are under Section 15708 the property of the state, against any risks and in any amounts that the board may deem necessary to protect the interests of the state. No state funds apportioned under this chapter shall be used to pay the premiums on said insurance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15710.

Where a district is required by a contract entered into between itself and a general construction contractor to obtain, at its own expense, insurance covering risks incurred during any construction for which an apportionment has been made, the cost thereof may be paid directly to said district out of the Public School Building Loan Fund.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to provide for reimbursement to school districts for any builders’ risk insurance that may have been furnished and paid for by the districts in
 connection with approved apportionments from the Public School Building Loan Fund from the time of the effective date of Chapter 1389 of the Statutes of 1949.

The Legislature in adopting this section expressly recognizes that eligible school districts in making provision for builders’ risk insurance during the period of construction of new buildings has provided a saving for the taxpayers of the district, and also has reduced the amount which otherwise would have been paid out of the Public School Building Loan Fund to the district if the cost of the builders’ risk insurance had been borne by the contractor with the district. For this reason the Legislature hereby finds, determines, and declares that the adoption of this section having an effect retroactive to the effective date of Chapter 1389 of the Statutes of 1949 is therefore lawful, proper, and represents the saving of public funds for a lawful and public purpose.

The
 Controller of the State of California is hereby authorized and directed to cancel and annul any claims or demands against the school district arising out of, or in any way connected with, claims for reimbursement from the school districts to the Public School Building Loan Fund arising out of the direct purchase of builders’ risk insurance on any construction by any school district under an approved application by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15712.

Funds apportioned to a school district under this chapter for a project, remaining unencumbered or unexpended one year from the date the application of the district for the apportionment was approved, shall not be encumbered or expended except as provided in this section.

The governing board of the district shall notify the board of its desire to encumber or expend the funds. The board shall immediately request the State Department of Education to, and the department shall, review the project for which apportionment was
 made. If the State Department of Education finds that the conditions existing at the time it approved the project for which the apportionment was made have so changed that the needs of the district are less than originally determined, it shall notify the board of its findings and of the respects in which the project should accordingly be modified. The board shall review the project and revise the project in any manner that it deems necessary, subject to the provisions of Section 15727, and make any changes in the purposes for which the apportionment may be expended that it deems necessary. The cost of the project as revised by the board shall be computed in the manner prescribed by Section 15713 and the excess, if any, of the amount theretofore apportioned to the district over the computed cost of the revised project shall be deducted by the board from the apportionment made to the district. The board shall give notice of its action, in writing, to the Controller, the governing board of the district, and the
 county auditor and the county treasurer having jurisdiction over the public school building fund of the district. If the amount of the excess, or any portion thereof, has not been paid to the district, the excess, or portion thereof, shall be made available for apportionment to other districts. If the excess, or portion thereof, has been paid to the district, it shall not be encumbered or expended by the district and shall become due and payable to the State of California. The governing board of the district and the county treasurer shall pay that amount to the Treasurer, out of the funds, and in the manner specified in Section 15752. The payment shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Public School Building Loan Fund in the State Treasury.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of
 the state.

This section does not authorize the board to increase any apportionment made to a district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15713.
